Utah statutes.
10-2-123.   Costs of incorporation.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), all costs of the incorporation proceeding, including request certification, feasibility study, petition certification, publication of notices, public hearings, and elections, shall be paid by the county in which the proposed city is located.

(2)  If incorporation occurs, the new municipality shall reimburse the county for the costs of the notices and hearing under Section 10-2-114, the notices and elections under Section 10-2-116, and all other incorporation activities occurring after the elections under Section 10-2-116.



Enacted by Chapter 389, 1997 General Session

